Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-910
Use of title and abbreviation.

A person licensed as a clinical nurse specialist has the right to use the title Clinical Nurse Specialist and the abbreviation CNS.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,121;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 30;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 262.